Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202379-3304
Computer science and technology education; required; high school graduation; requirements.

Beginning with school year 2025-26, each school district shall include computer science and technology education aligned to the academic content standards adopted pursuant to section 79-760.02 in the instructional program of its elementary, middle, and high schools. Beginning in school year 2027-28, each school district shall require each student to complete at least five high school credit hours in computer science and technology education prior to graduation. Such requirement may be completed through a single course or combination of high school courses that cover the computer science and technology academic content standards, and such courses may be made available in a traditional classroom setting, a blended-learning environment, or an online-based or other technology-based format.

Laws 2022, LB1112, § 4;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 101.